Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.090

Injunctive relief—Other applicable law.

The director of the department of licensing may refer such evidence as may be available concerning violations of this chapter or of any rule or order hereunder to the attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney, who may in his or her discretion, with or without such a reference, in addition to any other action they might commence, bring an action in the name of the state against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of any act or practice herein prohibited or declared unlawful: PROVIDED, That this chapter shall be considered in conjunction with chapters 9.04 and 19.86 RCW and the powers and duties of the attorney general and the prosecuting attorney as they may appear in chapters 9.04 and 19.86 RCW shall apply against all persons subject to this chapter.

[ 1989 c 20 s 9.]